Missouri, session 2026, SB1325.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 290.502, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 290.502,
to read as follows:
290.502. 1. Except as may be otherwise provided
pursuant to sections 290.500 to 290.530, effective January
1, 2007, every employer shall pay to each employee wages at
the rate of $6.50 per hour, or wages at the same rate or
rates set under the provisions of federal law as the
prevailing federal minimum wage applicable to those covered
jobs in interstate commerce, whichever rate per hour is
higher.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
the contrary, any employer may pay any minor employee wages
at the rate of not less than $12.30 per hour, or wages at
the same rate or rates set under the provisions of federal
law as the prevailing federal minimum wage applicable to
those covered jobs in interstate commerce, whichever rate
per hour is higher. For purposes of this subsection, the
term "minor employee" means any employee who is less than
eighteen years of age.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1325 2
3. The minimum wage shall be increased or decreased on
January 1, 2008, and on January 1 of successive years but
ending December 31, 2024, by the increase or decrease in the
cost of living. On September 30, 2007, and on each
September 30 of each successive year but ending December 31,
2024, the director shall measure the increase or decrease in
the cost of living by the percentage increase or decrease as
of the preceding July over the level as of July of the
immediately preceding year of the Consumer Price Index for
Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (CPI-W) or successor
index as published by the U.S. Department of Labor or its
successor agency, with the amount of the minimum wage
increase or decrease rounded to the nearest five cents.
[3.] 4. Except as may be otherwise provided pursuant
to sections 290.500 to 290.530, and notwithstanding
subsection 1 of this section, effective January 1, 2025,
every employer shall pay to each employee wages at the rate
of not less than $13.75 per hour, or wages at the same rate
or rates set under the provisions of federal law as the
federal minimum wage applicable to those covered jobs in
interstate commerce, whichever rate per hour is higher.
Thereafter, the minimum wage established by this subsection
shall be increased by $1.25 per hour, to $15.00 per hour,
effective January 1, 2026. If at any time the federal
minimum wage rate is above or is thereafter increased above
the minimum wage then in effect under this subsection, the
higher federal rate shall immediately become the minimum
wage required by this subsection.
[4.] 5. For purposes of this section, the term "public
employer" means an employer that is the state or a political
subdivision of the state, including a department, agency,
officer, bureau, division, board, commission, or

SB 1325 3
instrumentality of the state, or a city, county, town,
village, school district, or other political subdivision of
the state. Beginning on August 28, 2025, the provisions of
this section shall apply to a public employer with respect
to its employees.
✓